New Jersey, session 222, A2918.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  When the Board of Public Utilities considers any proceeding that may affect the rates that are charged to customers of an electric public utility for which the Division of Rate Counsel has submitted written concerns, the board shall respond, in writing, to each concern raised by the Division of Rate Counsel.  The board shall not take any action concerning the proceeding in which the Division of Rate Counsel has submitted written concerns until the board has responded to each concern in writing. b.    Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the board to follow any recommendations by the Division of Rate Counsel or to make any decisions regarding a proceeding based on the written concerns of the Division of Rate Counsel. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to proceedings commencing on or after the date of enactment.